Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 18.1 Transportation Investment and Debt Reduction Act of 2011

39-18.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation and Debt Reduction Act of 2011.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1.

39-18.1-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that:

Rhode Island now has, and for some years has had, a serious shortfall of funds available for the upkeep, maintenance, and repair of the state’s highways, roads, and bridges.

Rhode Island now funds, and for some years has funded, the local twenty percent (20%) match required to bring federal transportation dollars into the state by means of selling bonds. This has proven unsustainable and creates unaffordable debt-service obligations for future generations of Rhode Island taxpayers.

The health, safety, and convenience of Rhode Island’s citizens are seriously and adversely affected when the state’s highways, roads, and bridges are not kept in a proper state of upkeep, maintenance, and repair.

A critically important function of the state in maintaining the health, safety, and welfare of all the people of Rhode Island is to ensure the proper upkeep, maintenance, and repair of the state’s highways, roads, and bridges.

Rhode Island must consider all potential sustainable sources as a vehicle for maintaining and improving the transportation infrastructure of the state.

Additional stable and secure funding sources are absolutely necessary in order for the state to carry out its essential functions, including the upkeep, maintenance, and repair of the state’s highways, roads, and bridges, and providing for the continued functioning and reliability of public transit. In order to avoid to the full extent possible the creation of enormous and unaffordable debt-service obligations for future generations of Rhode Islanders, these funding sources should be created on a pay-as-you-go basis, and bonding should be reduced to the fullest extent practicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1.

39-18.1-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Department of transportation” means the department created by chapter 13 of title 42.

“Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of transportation.

“Highway maintenance” means the upkeep, maintenance, and repair of the state’s highways, roads, and bridges, including repaving or resurfacing the same.

“State planning council” means the state planning council within the division of planning of the department of administration, as established by §

42-11-10

.

“Transportation improvement program” means the transportation improvement program that is created and amended from time to time by the state planning council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1.

39-18.1-4.
Rhode Island highway maintenance account created.

There is hereby created a special account in the intermodal surface transportation fund as established in §

31-36-20

that is to be known as the Rhode Island highway maintenance account.

The fund shall consist of all those moneys that the state may, from time to time, direct to the fund, including, but not necessarily limited to, moneys derived from the following sources:

There is imposed a surcharge of thirty dollars ($30.00) per vehicle or truck, other than those with specific registrations set forth below in subsection (b)(1)(i). Such surcharge shall be paid by each vehicle or truck owner in order to register that owner’s vehicle or truck and upon each subsequent biennial registration. This surcharge shall be phased in at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) each year. The total surcharge will be ten dollars ($10.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, twenty dollars ($20.00) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and thirty dollars ($30.00) from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016, and each year thereafter.

For owners of vehicles or trucks with the following plate types, the surcharge shall be as set forth below and shall be paid in full in order to register the vehicle or truck and upon each subsequent renewal:

For owners of trailers, the surcharge shall be one-half (1/2) of the biennial registration amount and shall be paid in full in order to register the trailer and upon each subsequent renewal;

There is imposed a surcharge of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per vehicle or truck, other than those with specific registrations set forth in subsection (b)(2)(i) below, for those vehicles or trucks subject to annual registration, to be paid annually by each vehicle or truck owner in order to register that owner’s vehicle or truck and upon each subsequent annual registration. This surcharge will be phased in at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) each year. The total surcharge will be five dollars ($5.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, ten dollars ($10.00) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and fifteen dollars ($15.00) from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016, and each year thereafter.

For registrations of the following plate types, the surcharge shall be as set forth below and shall be paid in full in order to register the plate, and upon each subsequent renewal:

For owners of trailers, the surcharge shall be one-half (1/2) of the annual registration amount and shall be paid in full in order to register the trailer and upon each subsequent renewal.

For owners of school buses, the surcharge will be phased in at the rate of six dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) each year. The total surcharge will be six dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, and twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and each year thereafter;

There is imposed a surcharge of thirty dollars ($30.00) per license to operate a motor vehicle to be paid every five (5) years by each licensed operator of a motor vehicle. This surcharge will be phased in at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) each year. The total surcharge will be ten dollars ($10.00) from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, twenty dollars ($20.00) from July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and thirty dollars ($30.00) from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016, and each year thereafter. In the event that a license is issued or renewed for a period of less than five (5) years, the surcharge will be prorated according to the period of time the license will be valid;

All fees assessed pursuant to §

31-47.1-11

, and chapters 3, 6, 10, and 10.1 of title 31, except for fees assessed pursuant to §§

31-10-31(6)

and (8), shall be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account, provided that for fiscal years 2016, 2017, and 2018 these fees be transferred as follows:

From July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016, twenty-five percent (25%) will be deposited;

From July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2017, fifty percent (50%) will be deposited;

From July 1, 2017, through June 30, 2018, sixty percent (60%) will be deposited; and

From July 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, one hundred percent (100%) will be deposited;

All remaining funds from previous general obligation bond issues that have not otherwise been allocated.

Effective July 1, 2019, ninety-five percent (95%) of all funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account and shall be used only for the purposes set forth in this chapter. The remaining funds shall be retained as general revenues to partially offset cost of collections.

Unexpended balances and any earnings thereon shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account. There shall be no requirement that monies received into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account during any given calendar year or fiscal year be expended during the same calendar year or fiscal year.

The Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be administered by the director, who shall allocate and spend monies from the fund only in accordance with the purposes and procedures set forth in this chapter.

Plate Type Surcharge Antique $5.00 Farm $10.00 Motorcycle $13.00

Click to view

Plate Type Surcharge Boat Dealer $6.25 Cycle Dealer $6.25 In-transit $5.00 Manufacturer $5.00 New Car Dealer $5.00 Used Car Dealer $5.00 Racer Tow $5.00 Transporter $5.00 Bailee $5.00

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 6, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 8, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 27; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 8, § 2.

39-18.1-5.
Allocation of funds.

The monies in the highway maintenance fund to be directed to the department of transportation pursuant to §

39-18.1-4(b)(1)

— (b)(3) shall be allocated through the transportation improvement program process to provide the state match for federal transportation funds, in place of borrowing, as approved by the state planning council. The expenditure of moneys in the highway maintenance fund shall only be authorized for projects that appear in the state’s transportation improvement program.

Provided, however, that beginning with fiscal year 2015 and annually thereafter, the department of transportation will allocate necessary funding to programs that are designed to eliminate structural deficiencies of the state’s bridge, road, and maintenance systems and infrastructure.

Provided, further, that beginning July 1, 2015, five percent (5%) of available proceeds in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually to the Rhode Island public transit authority for operating expenditures.

Provided, further, that from July 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, in addition to the amount above, the Rhode Island public transit authority shall receive an amount of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) each fiscal year, except for the period July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2022, during which such amount or a portion thereof may come from federal coronavirus relief funds.

Provided, further, that the Rhode Island public transit authority shall convene a coordinating council consisting of those state agencies responsible for meeting the needs of low-income seniors and persons with disabilities, along with those stakeholders that the authority deems appropriate and are necessary to inform, develop, and implement the federally required coordinated public transit human services transportation plan.

The council shall develop, as part of the state’s federally required plan, recommendations for the appropriate and sustainable funding of the free-fare program for low-income seniors and persons with disabilities, while maximizing the use of federal funds available to support the transportation needs of this population.

The council shall report these recommendations to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate no later than November 1, 2018.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 6; P.L. 2017, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 11; art. 2, § 22; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

39-18.1-6.
Severability.

If any of the provisions of this chapter or the applicability thereof is held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the provisions of this chapter shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 22, § 1.